en: Collectible Swords
xx: Collectible Swords
cs: Sběratelské meče
da: Samlersværd
de: Schwerter
es: Espadas coleccionables
fr: Épées de collection
it: Spade da collezione
ja: 美術刀剣
nl: Zwaarden voor verzamelaars
no: Samlesverd
pl: Miecze kolekcjonerskie
pt: Espadas colecionáveis
ru: Коллекционные мечи
sv: Samlarsvärd
tr: Koleksiyonluk Kılıçlar

en: Sword Stands & Displays
xx: Sword Stands & Displays
cs: Podstavce a vitríny na meče
da: Holdere og stativer til sværd
de: Schwertständer & Schwerthalter
es: Peanas y vitrinas para espadas
fr: Supports et présentoirs pour épées
it: Supporti e vetrine per spade
ja: 刀掛台
nl: Zwaardenrekken
no: Sverdholdere og -stativer
pl: Stojaki i gabloty na miecze
pt: Estandes e exibições de espadas
ru: Подставки и стенды для мечей
sv: Svärdställningar och -montrar
tr: Kılıç Sehpaları ve Vitrinleri

en: Postage Stamps
xx: Postage Stamps
cs: Poštovní známky
da: Frimærker
de: Briefmarken
es: Sellos postales
fr: Timbres-poste
it: Francobolli
ja: 切手
nl: Postzegels
no: Frimerker
pl: Znaczki pocztowe
pt: Selos do correio
ru: Почтовые марки
sv: Frimärken
tr: Posta Pulları

en: Rocks & Fossils
xx: Rocks & Fossils
cs: Kameny a fosilie
da: Sten og fossiler
de: Steine & Fossilien
es: Rocas y fósiles
fr: Pierres et fossiles
it: Rocce e fossili
ja: 石・化石
nl: Stenen en fossielen
no: Steiner og fossiler
pl: Skały i skamieniałości
pt: Rochas e fósseis
ru: Горные породы и окаменелости
sv: Stenar och fossil
tr: Kayalar ve Fosiller

en: Scale Model Accessories
xx: Scale Model Accessories
cs: Modelářské potřeby
da: Skalamodeller – tilbehør
de: Modellbau-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para modelos a escala
fr: Accessoires pour maquettes
it: Accessori per modellini
ja: スケールモデル関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor schaalmodellen
no: Tilbehør til skalamodeller
pl: Akcesoria do modelarstwa redukcyjnego
pt: Acessórios para maquetes
ru: Принадлежности для масштабных моделей
sv: Tillbehör för modellbyggen
tr: Maket Aksesuarları

en: Scale Models
xx: Scale Models
cs: Zmenšené modely
da: Skalamodeller
de: Maßstabsmodelle
es: Maquetas a escala
fr: Maquettes, Maquette
it: Modelli in scala
ja: スケールモデル
nl: Schaalmodellen
no: Skalamodeller
pl: Modele redukcyjne
pt: Maquetes
ru: Масштабные модели
sv: Modellbyggen
tr: Maketler

en: Seal Stamps
xx: Seal Stamps
cs: Pečeti
da: Forseglingsstempler
de: Stempelsiegel
es: Sellos
fr: Cachets de cire
it: Sigilli
ja: シーリングスタンプ
nl: Lakzegels
no: Segl
pl: Pieczęcie
pt: Selos
ru: Штемпели
sv: Sigill
tr: Kaşeler

en: Sports Collectibles
xx: Sports Collectibles
cs: Sběratelské sportovní potřeby
da: Sportssamleobjekter
de: Sport-Sammelobjekte
es: Coleccionables deportivos
fr: Articles de sport de collection
it: Collezionismo - Sport
ja: コレクション用スポーツグッズ
nl: Verzamelobjecten sport
no: Sports-samlegjenstander
pl: Sportowe artykuły kolekcjonerskie
pt: Artigos esportivos colecionáveis
ru: Спортивные реликвии для коллекционеров
sv: Sportsamlarobjekt
tr: Spor Koleksiyonları

en: Autographed Sports Paraphernalia
xx: Autographed Sports Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané sportovní suvenýry
da: Sportsrekvisitter med autograf
de: Sportartikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos deportivos firmados
fr: Articles de sport dédicacés
it: Accessori autografati sport
ja: サイン入りスポーツグッズ
nl: Gesigneerde sportattributen
no: Sportsutstyr med autografer
pl: Pamiątki sportowe z autografem
pt: Parafernália esportiva autografada
ru: Спортивная атрибутика с автографами
sv: Signerad sportutrustning
tr: İmzalı Spor Kişisel Eşyaları

en: American Football Autographed Paraphernalia
xx: American Football Autographed Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané suvenýry z amerického fotbalu
da: Amerikansk fodbold – rekvisitter med autograf
de: American Football-Artikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos de fútbol americano firmados
fr: Articles de football américain dédicacés
it: Accessori autografati football
ja: サイン入りアメフトグッズ
nl: Gesigneerde attributen: American football
no: Sportsutstyr med autografer\, amerikansk fotball
pl: Pamiątki z autografem związane z futbolem amerykańskim
pt: Parafernália de futebol americano autografada
ru: Атрибутика с автографами звёзд американского футбола
sv: Signerad utrustning för amerikansk fotboll
tr: İmzalı Amerikan Futbolu Kişisel Eşyaları

en: Auto Racing Autographed Paraphernalia
xx: Auto Racing Autographed Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané suvenýry z automotosportu
da: Racerløb – rekvisitter med autograf
de: Rennsportartikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos automovilísticos firmados
fr: Articles de courses automobiles dédicacés
it: Accessori autografati automobilismo
ja: サイン入りモータースポーツグッズ
nl: Gesigneerde attributen: autoracen
no: Sportsutstyr med autografer\, billøp
pl: Pamiątki z wyścigów samochodowych z autografem
pt: Parafernália de automobilismo autografada
ru: Автоспортивная атрибутика с автографами
sv: Signerad bilsportsutrustning
tr: İmzalı Araba Yarışı Kişisel Eşyaları

en: Baseball & Softball Autographed Paraphernalia
xx: Baseball & Softball Autographed Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané suvenýry z baseballu a softbalu
da: Baseball og softball – rekvisitter med autograf
de: Baseball- & Softballartikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos de béisbol y sóftbol firmados
fr: Articles de baseball et softball dédicacés
it: Accessori autografati baseball e softball
ja: サイン入り野球・ソフトボールグッズ
nl: Gesigneerde attributen: honkbal en softbal
no: Sportsutstyr med autografer\, baseball
pl: Pamiątki baseballowe i softballowe z autografem
pt: Parafernália de beisebol e softbol autografada
ru: Бейсбольная и софтбольная атрибутика с автографами
sv: Signerad utrustning för baseboll och softball
tr: İmzalı Beyzbol ve Softbol Kişisel Eşyaları

en: Basketball Autographed Paraphernalia
xx: Basketball Autographed Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané suvenýry z basketbalu
da: Basketball – rekvisitter med autograf
de: Basketballartikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos de baloncesto firmados
fr: Articles de basket-ball dédicacés
it: Accessori autografati basket
ja: サイン入りバスケットボールグッズ
nl: Gesigneerde attributen: basketbal
no: Sportsutstyr med autografer\, basketball
pl: Pamiątki koszykarskie z autografem
pt: Parafernália de basquete autografada
ru: Баскетбольная атрибутика с автографами
sv: Signerad basketutrustning
tr: İmzalı Basketbol Kişisel Eşyaları

en: Boxing Autographed Paraphernalia
xx: Boxing Autographed Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané památeční předměty z oblasti boxu
da: Bokseudstyr med autograf
de: Boxartikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos de boxeo firmados
fr: Articles de boxe dédicacés
it: Cimeli autografati boxe
ja: サイン入りボクシンググッズ
nl: Gesigneerde attributen: boksen
no: Signert bokseutstyr
pl: Pamiątki bokserskie z autografem
pt: Parafernália autografada de boxe
ru: Боксерская атрибутика с автографами
sv: Signerad boxningsutrustning
tr: İmzalı Boks Eşyaları

en: Hockey Autographed Paraphernalia
xx: Hockey Autographed Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané suvenýry z hokeje
da: Ishockey – rekvisitter med autograf
de: Hockeyartikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos de hockey firmados
fr: Articles de hockey dédicacés
it: Accessori autografati hockey
ja: サイン入りホッケーグッズ
nl: Gesigneerde attributen: ijshockey
no: Sportsutstyr med autografer\, hockey
pl: Pamiątki hokejowe z autografem
pt: Parafernália de hóquei autografada
ru: Хоккейная атрибутика с автографами
sv: Signerad hockeyutrustning
tr: İmzalı Hokey Kişisel Eşyaları

en: Soccer Autographed Paraphernalia
xx: Soccer Autographed Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané suvenýry z fotbalu
da: Fodbold – rekvisitter med autograf
de: Fußballartikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos futbolísticos firmados
fr: Articles de football dédicacés
it: Accessori autografati calcio
ja: サイン入りサッカーグッズ
nl: Gesigneerde attributen: voetbal
no: Sportsutstyr med autografer\, fotball
pl: Pamiątki piłkarskie z autografem
pt: Parafernália de futebol autografada
ru: Футбольная атрибутика с автографами
sv: Signerad fotbollsutrustning
tr: İmzalı Futbol Kişisel Eşyaları

en: Tennis Autographed Sports Paraphernalia
xx: Tennis Autographed Sports Paraphernalia
cs: Podepsané suvenýry z tenisu
da: Tennis – rekvisitter med autograf
de: Tennisartikel mit Autogramm
es: Objetos deportivos de tenis firmados
fr: Articles de tennis dédicacés
it: Accessori autografati sport tennis
ja: サイン入りテニスグッズ
nl: Gesigneerde tennisattributen
no: Sportsutstyr med autografer\, tennis
pl: Pamiątki tenisowe z autografem
pt: Parafernália esportiva de tênis autografada
ru: Теннисная атрибутика с автографами
sv: Signerad tennisutrustning
tr: İmzalı Tenis Kişisel Eşyaları

en: Sports Fan Accessories
xx: Sports Fan Accessories
cs: Doplňky pro sportovní fanoušky
da: Tilbehør for sportsfans
de: Sport-Fanartikel
es: Accesorios para aficionados a los deportes
fr: Accessoires pour fans de sport
it: Accessori tifosi di sport
ja: スポーツファングッズ
nl: Artikelen voor sportfans
no: Sportsfan-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria dla fanów sportu
pt: Acessórios para fãs de esportes
ru: Товары для спортивных болельщиков
sv: Tillbehör för sportfans
tr: Sporsever Aksesuarları

en: American Football Fan Accessories
xx: American Football Fan Accessories
cs: Doplňky pro fanoušky amerického fotbalu
da: Amerikansk fodbold-fans – udstyr
de: American Football-Fanartikel
es: Accesorios para aficionados al fútbol americano
fr: Accessoires pour fans de football américain
it: Accessori tifosi football
ja: アメフトファングッズ
nl: Fanartikelen: American football
no: Tilbehør for fans av amerikansk fotball
pl: Akcesoria dla fanów futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Acessórios para fãs de futebol americano
ru: Товары для болельщиков американского футбола
sv: Tillbehör för fans av amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Taraftar Aksesuarları

en: Auto Racing Fan Accessories
xx: Auto Racing Fan Accessories
cs: Doplňky pro fanoušky automotosportu
da: Racerløbsfans – udstyr
de: Rennsport-Fanartikel
es: Accesorios para aficionados al automovilismo
fr: Accessoires pour fans de courses automobiles
it: Accessori tifosi automobilismo
ja: モータースポーツファングッズ
nl: Fanartikelen: autoracen
no: Tilbehør for billøp-fans
pl: Akcesoria dla fanów wyścigów samochodowych
pt: Acessórios para fãs de automobilismo
ru: Товары для болельщиков автогонок
sv: Tillbehör för bilsportfans
tr: Araba Yarışı Sever Aksesuarları